Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 4 Division of Information Systems
25-7-102. Center for Workforce Excellence.

For the purpose of this section, “center” means the Center for Workforce Excellence.

(1)There is created the Center for Workforce Excellence which shall conduct a pilot project to assist industrial development through the coordination of training programs and services.

The pilot project shall be a cooperative effort among Ouachita Technical College, Malvern High School, the Grande Nutrino Project Consortium, private industry, and other appropriate groups.

Local industrial groups, local governmental units, and private enterprise should provide much of the financial support needed for the pilot project. Such support should include financial support for items such as office space, expenses, and utilities.

The Ouachita Technical College Board shall establish guidelines governing the operation of the center.

(1)The goals of the center shall be to:

Facilitate the development of students and workers, members of the “learning force” within Arkansas communities and companies, with a focus on workers' skills and workplace tools of the future, particularly high-level technical training and education; and

Foster skills, knowledge, and understanding relevant to real-world jobs, careers, and lifestyles through the economic competitiveness of students, workers, communities, companies, and associated groups in a global political community.

The center shall develop a strategic management plan to include initial industry services training, with a survey of existing facilities, opportunities for training within the potential project area, and development of a campaign plan to overcome training deficiencies in the areas through reliance on existing resources through the cooperation and development of new training capability through innovative low cost means.

The center shall assist private industry in determining what training services and programs are available, the steps necessary to provide the training services and programs needed by the industry, and how long it would take to develop the needed training services and programs.

(1)The Ouachita Technical College Board shall establish a local advisory committee to provide guidance to the center in implementing the pilot project. The local advisory committee shall include representatives of Ouachita Technical College, Malvern High School, the Grande Nutrino Project Consortium, and private industry. The board may include representatives of other appropriate groups and organizations.

The purpose of the local advisory committee shall be to assist the center in determining the proper focus for industrial development.

The local advisory committee shall make recommendations concerning:

“Soft skills”, interpersonal relationships such as discipline, self-reliance, and an ability to communicate properly;

“Hard skills”, such as skills required of workers by technical training;

Apprenticeship and internship programs for students and potential workers; and

Other issues concerning the training and development of students and workers.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 52, §§ 1-6; 1993, No. 665, § 1.

25-7-103. [Repealed.]

25-8-101. Secretary — Organization — Personnel — Definition.

(1)The Department of Finance and Administration shall consist of the divisions which existed as of July 1, 1971, within the State Administration Department and the Department of Revenues and any other divisions which may be created by law and placed under the Department of Finance and Administration, subject to the transfer of a division or department of the Department of Finance and Administration as a state entity under this act.

There is created a Racing Division and an Alcoholic Beverage Control Division within the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, with the advice and consent of the Governor, shall appoint the heads of the respective divisions. The secretary may appoint an Administrative Assistant for Revenue to serve as the secretary's agent. All other personnel of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary, provided that nothing in this section shall be so construed as to reduce any right which an employee of the Department of Finance and Administration shall have under any civil service or merit system.

Each division of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the secretary. The secretary may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to the various divisions of the Department of Finance and Administration as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the Department of Finance and Administration.

For the purposes of the tax, driver's license, and motor vehicle registration and licensing laws, the term “secretary” shall mean the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, the Administrative Assistant for Revenue, or his or her authorized agent. The Administrative Assistant for Revenue shall act as the secretary's agent and take any and all actions necessary to administer the laws.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-905; Acts 1993, No. 332, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3564.

25-8-102. Authority of secretary generally.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, with the approval of the Governor, may adopt reasonable rules and procedures, not inconsistent with the law, which he or she deems desirable for the effective administration of the Department of Finance and Administration and any of its divisions.

The secretary shall have authority to install any recordkeeping and other procedures in his or her office and in other offices and departments of the state which he or she shall deem necessary or advisable to carry out his or her functions and duties. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to grant the secretary any authority to establish recordkeeping or other procedures, or rules with respect to the elected constitutional officers of the state, the General Assembly and its committees, or other agencies who are exempt from all or a part of the procedures set forth in the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq., and the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101 et seq.

The secretary may from time to time establish within the department any sections or other administrative units which he or she may deem desirable for the effective operation of the department and any division thereof, provided that the duties and functions of the sections or administrative units are within the purpose authorized by law.

The secretary may appoint a designee to appear on behalf of the secretary at meetings of any board or commission of which the secretary is a member in his or her capacity as Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. The designee may vote on behalf of the secretary.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 468, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-808; Acts 2001, No. 243, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2912; 2019, No. 910, § 3565.

25-8-103. [Repealed.]

The Director of the Division of Budgets and Accounting shall be the Deputy Director of the Department of Finance and Administration. He or she shall have all functions, powers, and duties granted under §19-1-203 and all other laws pertaining to his or her office and any other functions, powers, and duties which are assigned and delegated to him or her by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 468, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-804; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3566.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

25-8-105. Federal aid programs.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall have and establish the functions, duties, powers, and responsibilities for the coordination of all federal aid programs within the state and shall provide assistance to any department seeking federal aid.

All applications for federal grants submitted by state agencies shall be processed through the department. However, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the discretion to authorize state agencies to file copies of grant applications with the department as a substitute for the processing requirement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

The office may maintain an inventory of furniture, equipment, and other items which shall be made available to state agencies on rental agreements based upon fair and reasonable rental values.

The department is authorized to establish a fair and reasonable fee schedule for redistributing property between state agencies upon their request.

Proceeds from the sale, transfer, or rental of property by the director shall be accounted for as follows:

The purchasers, transferees, and lessees of property available for such purposes as are authorized by this section shall transmit to the office the agreed sale price, service charge, or rental fee;

The office shall deposit the full amount of proceeds received, as set out above, in the State Treasury in the manner as provided by law; and

Proceeds from the sale or transfer of property deposited in the State Treasury shall be classified as nonrevenue receipts and credited to the Property Sales Holding Fund herein created on the books of the Treasurer of State as a trust fund.

Funds deposited in the Property Sales Holding Fund may be expended only by the selling or transferring agency under procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and appropriations provided by the General Assembly.

However, funds deposited in the Property Sales Holding Fund from the sale of property purchased from agency cash funds may be refunded to the agency cash fund from which the original expenditure was made by the issuance of a warrant under procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Auditor of State to be payable from appropriations provided by the General Assembly for disposition of the proceeds.

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules, not inconsistent with law, for compliance with the provisions of this section, the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., and the sale of surplus commodities to not-for-profit organizations under § 22-1-101.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added “the sale of surplus commodities to not-for-profit organizations under §22-1-101” to the end of (f).

The 2015 amendment redesignated and rewrote former (a) as (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as (a)(1), the introductory language of (a)(2), and (a)(2)(A); redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(2)(B); and substituted “4-H Foundation programs” for “Arkansas 4-H Foundation” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Office of State Procurement” in (b)(1) and at the end of (b)(2)(A); substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(3); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” preceding “shall” in the introductory language of (e); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (f).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Agencies, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 601.

Cited: Beverly Enterprises-Arkansas, Inc. v. Ark. Health Servs. Comm'n, 308 Ark. 221, 824 S.W.2d 363 (1992).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 795, §§ 1-9, provided:

“SECTION 1.Effective July 1, 1993, the Child Support Enforcement Unit of the Department of Human Services shall be transferred by a Type 2 transfer to the Department of Finance and Administration Revenue Services Division.

“SECTION 2.All powers, duties, functions, records, property, and funds administered or provided by other support divisions within the Department of Human Services shall be transferred to the Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Department of Finance and Administration Revenue Services Division upon the effective date of the transfer.

“SECTION 3.The Department of Human Services and the Department of Computer Services shall grant access to and provide information as determined by the Office of Child Support Enforcement necessary to successfully accomplish their mission.

“SECTION 4.COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds authorized by this Act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and the restrictions of the State Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

“SECTION 5.LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations contained in this Act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for which this Act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

“SECTION 6.CODE. All provisions of this Act of a general and permanent nature are amendatory to the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall incorporate the same in the Code.

“SECTION 7.SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the Act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are declared to be severable.

“SECTION 8.GENERAL REPEALER. All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are hereby repealed.

“SECTION 9.EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session, that the provisions of this Act are of critical importance to preserve the efficient operation of programs that deliver services to the citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (c).

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 5; 1973, No. 710, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-905; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3567.

25-8-106. Marketing and redistribution of state personal property.

(1)This section applies only with respect to personal property.

This section does not apply to or affect the:

Disposition of surplus real property of the state; or

Sale of plants, animals, or commodities of plants or animals by a public institution of higher education if the proceeds from the sale are used solely for agricultural research, extension, or teaching programs, including without limitation 4-H programs and Future Farmers of America programs.

(1)There is created within the Office of State Procurement a Marketing and Redistribution Section for the purpose of promoting and ensuring effective utilization of surplus state property.

(A)All state agencies, boards, commissions, departments, and colleges and universities are required and county, municipal, or other tax-supported institutions are authorized to utilize the services of the Marketing and Redistribution Section, unless specifically exempted in writing by the State Procurement Director.

(i)Nothing in this section shall be construed to make it mandatory that county, municipal, or other local government units utilize the services of the Marketing and Redistribution Section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to make it mandatory that any agency, department, division, office, board, commission, or institution of this state, including state-supported institutions of higher education, utilize the services of the Marketing and Redistribution Section in the sale of surplus computer equipment and electronics to state agency employees for a price not less than ten percent (10%) above depreciated value.

The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall maintain adequate and accurate records of the costs for operating the Marketing and Redistribution Section and is authorized to establish fair and reasonable charges for the services of the section. The charges for services shall be deposited in the State Treasury as nonrevenue receipts, there to be credited to the Property Sales Holding Fund for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of the Marketing and Redistribution Section.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 44, §§ 1-7; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 1; 1973, No. 806, §§ 4, 5; 1973, No. 876, § 30; 1977, No. 436, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-812 — 5-818; Acts 2001, No. 589, § 1; 2001, No. 1410, § 13; 2013, No. 1020, § 3; 2015, No. 686, § 1; 2017, No. 307, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3568-3570.

25-8-107. Office of Child Support Enforcement.

The Child Support Enforcement Unit of the Division of Economic and Medical Services of the Department of Human Services is hereby transferred by a type 2 transfer pursuant to §25-2-105 to the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be known as the “Office of Child Support Enforcement”.

All powers, duties, functions, records, property, and funds administered or provided by other support divisions within the Department of Human Services shall be transferred to the Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration on July 1, 1993.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Information Systems shall grant access to and provide information determined by the Office of Child Support Enforcement to be necessary to successfully accomplish its mission.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 957, §§ 4, 7, 8; 2019, No. 910, § 6302.

25-8-108. Contract labor.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may authorize use of contract labor in the Revenue Division from January until July of a given year without regard to any limitation of duration or hours.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 931, § 28; 1995, No. 226, § 26; 2019, No. 910, § 3571.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

25-8-109. Loans to marketing and redistribution.

In the event the moneys available in the Property Sales Holding Fund are not adequate during any month of each year of the fiscal biennium to meet the payroll commitments of the Marketing and Redistribution Section for the regular salaries and personal services matching appropriation, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is hereby authorized to make loans, from time to time as needed, from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Property Sales Holding Fund to provide the moneys required to meet the payroll and personal services matching appropriation requirements for any such month. Provided that, if at the end of each fiscal year the Property Sales Holding Fund did not receive sufficient income to repay the entire amount of any such moneys borrowed from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund for the purposes as authorized herein, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is hereby authorized to transfer from the State Central Services Fund such amount as is necessary to reimburse the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund in behalf of loans made to the Property Sales Holding Fund to reimburse the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund for the amount of any such loan remaining unpaid at the end of each fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1428, § 24; 2019, No. 910, § 3572.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Office of State Procurement” in the first sentence.

25-8-110. Duties of Department of Transformation and Shared Services and Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall:

Develop retention schedules for control, preservation, protection, and disposition of the electronic records of state agencies under § 25-18-601 et seq.;

Direct the development of policies and procedures that state agencies shall follow in developing information technology plans and technology-related budgets and technology project justification;

Review procurements to ensure conformity with information policies and standards and state-level plans and implementation strategies;

Advise state agencies on information technology contracts and agreements; and

Develop and promulgate rules and guidelines governing the retention and management of public records commonly found in most state agencies under § 25-18-601 et seq.

With assistance from the Division of Workforce Services, the Department of Finance and Administration shall establish and maintain a web page to:

Provide a menu of links to employer-related state web applications for required reporting, tax payments, and other data submissions;

Allow an employer to select a link based upon a desired type of function or application and be redirected to the appropriate agency web application; and

Provide information about tax submissions, employment reports, and child support submissions on the respective agency sites, including without limitation due dates, payment options, and agency contact information.

The initial scope of the web page shall include links to:

Online taxpayer services administered by the Department of Finance and Administration through the Arkansas Taxpayer Access Point web page;

Unemployment and new hire submissions administered by the division; and

Information concerning employer reporting and payment functions provided by the Office of Child Support Enforcement.

The web page shall be designed with sufficient flexibility to allow additional links to other state agencies to be added as appropriate.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1458, § 1, provided: “Purpose and intent. The purpose of this act is to:

“(1)Create a public web page to:

“(A)Provide a menu of links to employer-related state web applications for required reporting, tax payments, and other data submissions; and

“(B)Allow an employer to select a link based upon a desired type of function or application and be redirected to the appropriate agency web application; and

“(2)Provide information about tax submissions, employment reports, and child support submissions on the respective agency sites, including without limitation due dates, payment options, and agency contact information.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (6).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section heading; designated the introductory language as (a) and designated former (6) as present (b), redesignating its subdivisions accordingly; substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Service” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “Division of Workforce Services, the Department of Finance and Administration shall establish” for “Department of Workforce Services, establish” in the introductory language of (b)(1); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (b)(2)(B).

Publisher's Notes. This chapter, concerning the Department of Health, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5116, effective July 1, 2019.The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-9-101. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-9-11; 2001, No. 785, § 1; 2005, No. 1954, § 7; 2007, No. 384, § 7; 2013, No. 435, § 2.

25-9-103. Acts 1997, No. 768, § 32; 1999, No. 1426, § 31.

25-9-104. Acts 1997, No. 768, § 34.

25-9-105. Acts 1997, No. 768, § 41.

25-9-106. Acts 1999, No. 1219, § 1; 1999, No. 1426, § 50; 2013, No. 1107, § 44; 2015, No. 299, § 33; 2017, No. 707, §290; 2017, No. 913, § 120.